Utah statutes.
76-6a-4.   Operation as felony -- Participation as misdemeanor --
Investigation -- Prosecution.
(1)  Any person who knowingly organizes, establishes, promotes, or administers
a pyramid scheme is guilty of a third degree felony.
(2)  Any person who participates in a pyramid scheme only by receiving
compensation for the introduction of other persons into the pyramid scheme
rather than from the sale of goods, services, or other property is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor.
(3)  The appropriate county attorney or district attorney has primary
responsibility for investigating and prosecuting criminal violations of this
chapter.
